Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.718

State route No. 16—Tax on operation prohibited.

A city or town may not impose a tax on amounts received from operating state route number 16 corridor transportation systems and facilities constructed and operated under chapter 47.46 RCW.

[ 1998 c 179 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—1998 c 179: "The legislature finds and declares that the people of the state may not enjoy the full benefits of public-private initiative for state route number 16 corridor improvements due to the many taxes that may apply to this project. Generally these taxes would not apply if the state built these projects through traditional financing and construction methods. These tax exemptions will reduce the cost of the project, allow lower tolls, and reduce the time for which tolls are charged." [ 1998 c 179 s 1.]